Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1200.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 45-132, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE45-132. Filling large bodies of water for landscape or recreational purposes prohibited; exceptions; preemption A. Except as provided in subsection B of this section, in an active management area established under chapter 2 of this title, a person shall not use any water for the purpose of filling or refilling all or a portion of a body of water. B. This section does not apply to a body of water if any of the following applies: 1. The body of water was filled before January 1, 1987. If the surface area of the body of water is increased on or after January 1, 1987, this exception does not apply to the quantity of water that is added. 2. The director has determined that substantial capital investment has been made in the physical on-site construction of the body of water before January 1, 1987. If the surface area of the body of water is increased after it is initially filled, this exception does not apply to the quantity of water that is added. 3. The body of water is located in a recreational facility that is open to the public and that is owned or operated by the United States, this state, a city, town or county, a flood control district established under title 48, chapter 21 or a multi-county water conservation district established under title 48, chapter 22. 4. The body of water is filled and refilled exclusively with any one or any combination of the following: (a) Effluent only if the body of water was CONSTRUCTED or SUBSTANTIAL CAPITAL investment was made TOWARD CONSTRUCTION of the body of water before December 31, 2030. (b) Storm water runoff that is not subject to appropriation under section 45-141. (c) Poor quality water used pursuant to a permit issued under subsections C and D and e of this section. (d) Groundwater withdrawn pursuant to a drainage water withdrawal permit issued under section 45-519. (e) Groundwater withdrawn in the first year of a temporary dewatering permit issued under section 45-518. (f) Groundwater withdrawn as part of a remedial action under title 49, chapter 2, article 5, including mitigation of a nonhazardous release undertaken pursuant to an order issued by the department of environmental quality pursuant to section 49-286. (g) Water used pursuant to a permit for interim water use issued under section 45-133. (h) Surface water except central Arizona project water that, as determined by the director, physically occurs at such times, in such quantities or under such other circumstances that it cannot be physically captured and beneficially used by any other holder of an appropriative right. 5. The body of water is an integral part of a golf course that complies with any applicable conservation requirements in the management plan for the active management area adopted under chapter 2, article 9 of this title. 6. The body of water is unsealed and is an integral part of an underground storage facility for which the director has issued a permit under chapter 3.1 of this title. 7. The body of water is a swimming pool that is owned and operated by a hotel, motel, country club or resort and that has a surface area equal to or less than forty-three thousand five hundred sixty square feet. If a hotel, motel, country club or resort has more than one swimming pool, only one of those swimming pools may have a surface area greater than twelve thousand three hundred twenty square feet. C. For a body of water that was constructed before January 1, 2026 in an active management area PURSUANT to subsection B, PARAGRAPH 4, SUBDIVISION (a) of this section and that was used to convey noneffluent for landscape or RECREATIONAL PURPOSES between June 30, 2023 and June 30, 2026, a person may use the body of water as a conduit for TRANSPORTING ANOTHER type of water for landscape or recreational purposes off the body of water by commingling the effluent with the water that the person uses for landscape or recreational purposes  off the body of water if the owner or operator of the body Of water does all of the following: 1. Using measuring devices that are APPROVED by the director: (a) measures the volume of water by type of water that is delivered to and withdrawn from the body of water for landscape or recreational PURPOSES in each calendar year. (b) measures the total volume of effluent that is delivered to the body of water in each calendar year. 2. adds a volume of effluent to the body of water each calendar year that is equal to or greater than the amount that is lost to seepage and evaporation from the body of water.  The amount lost to seepage and evaporation shall be determined by SUBTRACTING the amount of water that is withdrawn for landscape or recreational purposes from the total amount of water delivered to the body of water in the calendar year.  The amount of noneffluent delivered to the body of water may not exceed the total volume withdrawn from the body of water for landscape or recreational purposes. except as allowed pursuant to section 45-468 or any other law, The effluent must be delivered to the end user before commingling with any other type of water. 3. on or before March 31 of each year, reports both of the following to the director: (a) the volume of water that the person delivered to the body of water in the preceding calendar year by type of water. (b) the volume of water that the person withdrew from the body of water for landscape or recreational purposes in the preceding calendar year. 4. On or before January 1, 2028, provides documentation to the director that the body of water was used to convey noneffluent for landscape or recreational purposes between June 30, 2023 and June 30, 2026.  The documentation must contain all of the following: (a) annual reports that the owner or operator previously filed with the director. (b) a report that is affixed with a seal by a registered civil engineer, that describes the distribution system of the body of water and that includes a map and narrative description of the source of the water and the location and type of use of the water. (c) an affidavit of an owner of the body of water that affirms compliance with this subsection. C. D. A person who seeks to use poor quality groundwater to fill or refill all or a portion of a body of water shall apply to the director for a permit to use the groundwater for that purpose. The director may issue a permit if the applicant demonstrates that all of the following apply: 1. The applicant otherwise has a right to use the proposed source of groundwater for the proposed purpose. 2. The groundwater because of its poor quality cannot be used for another beneficial purpose at the present time and it is not economically feasible to treat and transport the groundwater and use it for another beneficial purpose. 3. The withdrawal of the groundwater is consistent with the management plan and achievement of the management goal for the active management area. D. e. A permit issued pursuant to subsection C  d of this section may be issued for a period of up to thirty-five years. The director shall determine the duration of the permit on the basis of the estimated life of the source of poor quality groundwater and the potential for future beneficial use. The director shall monitor the use of groundwater pursuant to the permit and shall terminate the permit if any of the conditions for issuance of the permit no longer applies. A permit may be renewed subject to the same criteria used in granting the original permit. f. Unless AUTHORIZED pursuant to section 45-133, subsection c of this section does not allow the use of groundwater for either of the following purposes: 1. to provide the initial fill of a body of water. 2. to meet seepage or evaporative loss of a body of water. E. g. This section preempts all municipal and county laws, charters, ordinances, rules and regulations relating to the use of any water to fill or refill all or a portion of a body of water, except that this section does not preempt a law, charter, ordinance, rule or regulation that has previously been adopted, passed or enacted or is subsequently adopted, passed or enacted if the law, charter, ordinance, rule or regulation is more restrictive than this section.END_STATUTE